csv2fst/yaml_output/VTI_IND_TI3.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijisiininaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0PlO: nimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gimiijisiiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: omiijisiininaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO: nimiijiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gimiijiminaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijinaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijininaadog
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0PlO: nimiijiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gimiijiminaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijinaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijinaawaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: omiijininaadogenan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigoban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigwaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiinigoban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigoban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigwaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijinigoban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0PlO: nimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gimiijisiimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijisiinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijisiinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijisiinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijisiinini,omiijisiini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO: nimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaa
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: nimiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gimiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0PlO: nimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gimiijimin
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gimiijinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: omiijinan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: omiijinaawaan
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijinini,omiijini]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: nimiijisiiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gimiijisiiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijisiinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijisiinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijisiininaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [nimiijisiinaabaniin,nimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gimiijisiinaabaniin,gimiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [nimiijisiiminaabaniin,nimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gimiijisiiminaabaniin,gimiijisiiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gimiijisiinaawaabaniin,gimiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [omiijisiinaabaniin,omiijisiinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [omiijisiinaawaabaniin,omiijisiinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijisiininaabaniin,omiijisiininaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: nimiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gimiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO: nimiijiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gimiijiminaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gimiijinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: omiijinaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: omiijinaawaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: omiijininaaban
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [nimiijinaabaniin,nimiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gimiijinaabaniin,gimiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [nimiijiminaabaniin,nimiijiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gimiijiminaabaniin,gimiijiminaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gimiijinaawaabaniin,gimiijinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [omiijinaabaniin,omiijinaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [omiijinaawaabaniin,omiijinaawaabanen]
     miijin+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [omiijininaabaniin,omiijininaabanen]
